Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7630.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27-18-95 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-18 entitled "Accident
and Sickness Insurance Policies" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-18-95. Acute mental health crisis mobile response and stabilization services.
[Effective January 1, 2026.]
(a) As used in this section, “mobile response and stabilization services” means a behavioral
health crisis intervention system providing immediate de-escalation, stabilization services, and
follow-up care, provided by a certified licensed provider. These services are delivered to provide
rapid response to, assessment of, and early intervention for a child or youth eighteen (18) years of
age and younger children and youth up to the age of twenty-one (21) experiencing an acute mental
health crisis. Symptoms might include, but are not limited to:
(1) Aggression;
(2) Self-injury;
(3) Trauma;
(4) Acute depression/anxiety;
(5) Challenges at school; Suicidal or homicidal thoughts/behaviors; and
(6) Extreme parent/child conflict.
Mobile response and stabilization services are provided by “certified licensed providers”
meaning licensed behavioral health organizations providing outpatient services, which have
demonstrated expertise in delivering child-specific mobile response and stabilization services, and

have obtained relevant state licensure or certification.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for mobile response and
stabilization services, consistent with the core components of the mobile crisis model, and in
accordance with the insurer’s existing reimbursement, credentialing, and contracting processes,
provided any utilization review processes do not limit timely access or fidelity to the model.
(c) This section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
(4) Long-term care;
(5) Medicare supplement;
(6) Limited benefit health;
(7) Specified disease indemnity;
(8) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident or both; and
(9) Other limited benefit policies.
(d) Insurers shall reimburse licensed providers for mobile response and stabilization
services as defined in this section at rates of reimbursement equal to or greater than the prevailing
integrated state Medicaid rate for mobile response and stabilization services on or after October 1,
2026, using the state Medicaid payment methodology as established by the executive office of
health and human services.
SECTION 2. Section 27-19-87 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-19 entitled "Nonprofit
Hospital Service Corporations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-19-87. Acute mental health crisis mobile response and stabilization services.
[Effective January 1, 2026.]
(a) As used in this section, “mobile response and stabilization services” means a behavioral
health crisis intervention system providing immediate de-escalation, stabilization services, and
follow-up care, provided by a certified licensed provider. These services are delivered to provide
rapid response to, assessment of, and early intervention for a child or youth eighteen (18) years of
age and younger children and youth up to the age of twenty-one (21) experiencing an acute mental
health crisis. Symptoms might include, but are not limited to:
(1) Aggression;
(2) Self-injury;
LC005129/SUB A - Page 2 of 7

(3) Trauma;
(4) Acute depression/anxiety;
(5) Challenges at school; Suicidal or homicidal thoughts/behaviors; and
(6) Extreme parent/child conflict.
Mobile response and stabilization services are provided by “certified licensed providers”
meaning licensed behavioral health organizations providing outpatient services, which have
demonstrated expertise in delivering child-specific mobile response and stabilization services, and
have obtained relevant state licensure or certification.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for mobile response and
stabilization services, consistent with the core components of the mobile crisis model, and in
accordance with the insurer’s existing reimbursement, credentialing, and contracting processes,
provided any utilization review processes do not limit timely access or fidelity to the model.
(c) This section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
(4) Long-term care;
(5) Medicare supplement;
(6) Limited benefit health;
(7) Specified disease indemnity;
(8) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident or both; and
(9) Other limited benefit policies.
(d) Insurers shall reimburse licensed providers for mobile response and stabilization
services as defined in this section at rates of reimbursement equal to or greater than the prevailing
integrated state Medicaid rate for mobile response and stabilization services on or after October 1,
2026, using the state Medicaid payment methodology as established by the executive office of
health and human services.
SECTION 3. Section 27-20-83 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-20 entitled "Nonprofit
Medical Service Corporations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-20-83. Acute mental health crisis mobile response and stabilization services.
[Effective January 1, 2026.]
(a) As used in this section, “mobile response and stabilization services” means a behavioral
LC005129/SUB A - Page 3 of 7

health crisis intervention system providing immediate de-escalation, stabilization services, and
follow-up care, provided by a certified licensed provider. These services are delivered to provide
rapid response to, assessment of, and early intervention for a child or youth eighteen (18) years of
age and younger children and youth up to the age of twenty-one (21) experiencing an acute mental
health crisis. Symptoms might include, but are not limited to:
(1) Aggression;
(2) Self-injury;
(3) Trauma;
(4) Acute depression/anxiety;
(5) Challenges at school; Suicidal or homicidal thoughts/behaviors; and
(6) Extreme parent/child conflict.
Mobile response and stabilization services are provided by “certified licensed providers”
meaning licensed behavioral health organizations providing outpatient services, which have
demonstrated expertise in delivering child-specific mobile response and stabilization services, and
have obtained relevant state licensure or certification.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for mobile response and
stabilization services, consistent with the core components of the mobile crisis model, and in
accordance with the insurer’s existing reimbursement, credentialing, and contracting processes,
provided any utilization review processes do not limit timely access or fidelity to the model.
(c) This section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
(4) Long-term care;
(5) Medicare supplement;
(6) Limited benefit health;
(7) Specified disease indemnity;
(8) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident or both; and
(9) Other limited benefit policies.
(d) Insurers shall reimburse licensed providers for mobile response and stabilization
services as defined in this section at rates of reimbursement equal to or greater than the prevailing
integrated state Medicaid rate for mobile response and stabilization services on or after October 1,
LC005129/SUB A - Page 4 of 7

2026, using the state Medicaid payment methodology as established by the executive office of
health and human services.
SECTION 4. Section 27-41-100 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-41 entitled "Health
Maintenance Organizations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-41-100. Acute mental health crisis mobile response and stabilization services.
[Effective January 1, 2026.]
(a) As used in this section, “mobile response and stabilization services” means a behavioral
health crisis intervention system providing immediate de-escalation, stabilization services, and
follow-up care, provided by a certified licensed provider. These services are delivered to provide
rapid response to, assessment of, and early intervention for a child or youth eighteen (18) years of
age and younger children and youth up to the age of twenty-one (21) experiencing an acute mental
health crisis. Symptoms might include, but are not limited to:
(1) Aggression;
(2) Self-injury;
(3) Trauma;
(4) Acute depression/anxiety;
(5) Challenges at school; Suicidal or homicidal thoughts/behaviors; and
(6) Extreme parent/child conflict.
Mobile response and stabilization services are provided by “certified licensed providers”
meaning licensed behavioral health organizations providing outpatient services, which have
demonstrated expertise in delivering child-specific mobile response and stabilization services, and
have obtained relevant state licensure or certification.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for mobile response and
stabilization services, consistent with the core components of the mobile crisis model, and in
accordance with the insurer’s existing reimbursement, credentialing, and contracting processes,
provided any utilization review processes do not limit timely access or fidelity to the model.
(c) This section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
(4) Long-term care;
(5) Medicare supplement;
LC005129/SUB A - Page 5 of 7

(6) Limited benefit health;
(7) Specified disease indemnity;
(8) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident or both; and
(9) Other limited benefit policies.
(d) Insurers shall reimburse licensed providers for mobile response and stabilization
services as defined in this section at rates of reimbursement equal to or greater than the prevailing
integrated state Medicaid rate for mobile response and stabilization services on or after October 1,
2026, using the state Medicaid payment methodology as established by the executive office of
health and human services.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005129/SUB A
========
LC005129/SUB A - Page 6 of 7